fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-pahkwesikan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - pahkwêsikan - ok : # -m animate noun, bread/bannock AEW NA1
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Sg: pahkwêsikan
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nipahkwêsikanim
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kipahkwêsikanim
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipahkwêsikaniminân
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: kipahkwêsikaniminaw
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kipahkwêsikanimiwâw

     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Pl: pahkwêsikanak
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nipahkwêsikanimak
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kipahkwêsikanimak
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nipahkwêsikaniminânak
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: kipahkwêsikaniminawak
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kipahkwêsikanimiwâwak
     
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Obv: pahkwêsikana
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nipahkwêsikanima
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kipahkwêsikanima
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nipahkwêsikaniminâna
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px21Pl+Obv: kipahkwêsikaniminawa
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kipahkwêsikanimiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanima
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa
     
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [pahkwêsikanis, pahkwêsikanisis]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nipahkwêsikanimis, nipahkwêsikanimisis]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kipahkwêsikanimis, kipahkwêsikanimisis]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nipahkwêsikanimisinân, nipahkwêsikanimisisinân]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: [kipahkwêsikanimisinaw, kipahkwêsikanimisisinaw]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kipahkwêsikanimisiwâw, kipahkwêsikanimisisiwâw]

     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [pahkwêsikanisak, pahkwêsikanisisak]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nipahkwêsikanimisak, nipahkwêsikanimisisak]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kipahkwêsikanimisak, kipahkwêsikanimisisak]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nipahkwêsikanimisinânak, nipahkwêsikanimisisinânak]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: [kipahkwêsikanimisinawak, kipahkwêsikanimisisinawak]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kipahkwêsikanimisiwâwak, kipahkwêsikanimisisiwâwak]
     
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [opahkwêsikanimisa, opahkwêsikanimisisa]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [opahkwêsikanimisiwâwa, opahkwêsikanimisisiwâwa]
     pahkwêsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa, opahkwêsikanimisisiyiwa]
